Illinois, session 104th, HB5200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-190 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-190 new)7    Sec. 15-190. Municipal worker homestead exemption.8    (a) Beginning in taxable year 2027, a homestead exemption 9is granted for property that (i) is located in a county with 101,000,000 or more inhabitants and (ii) is owned and occupied 11as a principal residence during the taxable year by a 12qualified municipal worker. The amount of the homestead 13exemption shall be a reduction from the equalized assessed 14value of the property in an amount equal to 5% of the equalized 15assessed value of the property. 16    (b) The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 17determine the eligibility of property to receive the exemption 18provided by this Section by affidavit, application, visual 19inspection, or questionnaire or by other reasonable methods. 20    (c) The exemption under this Section is in addition to any 21other homestead exemption provided in this Article 15. 22Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates Act, no 23reimbursement by the State is required for the implementation   HB5200- 2 -LRB104 20268 HLH 33719 b1of any mandate created by this Section. 2    (d) As used in this Section: 3    "Qualified municipal worker" means a person who is 4employed on a full-time basis by the municipality in which the 5property is located and who is required to reside in that 6municipality as a condition of his or her employment.  7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.